Tennessee, session 114, HB0757.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 66-7-112(b)(1)(B), is amended by
deleting "thirty (30) days" and substituting "forty-five (45) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it,
and applies to agreements entered into, amended, or renewed on or after such date
HB0757
001463
- 1 -